Vermont, session 2025-2026, H237.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 26 V.S.A. § 3001 is amended to read:
§ 3001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Practice of psychology” means rendering or offering to render to
individuals, groups, or organizations, for a consideration, any service involving
the application of principles, methods, and procedures of understanding,
predicting, and influencing behavior that are primarily drawn from the science
of psychology. The science of psychology includes assessment, diagnosis,
prevention, and amelioration of adjustment problems and emotional and
mental disorders of individuals and groups.
(2) “Psychologist” or “practicing psychologist” means a person who is
licensed to practice psychology under this chapter.
(3) “Psychologist-doctorate” means a person who is so licensed under
this chapter.
(4) “Psychologist-master” means a person who is so licensed under this
chapter.
(5) “Board” means the Board of Psychological Examiners established
under this chapter.
* * *
VT LEG #389247 v.1

No. 84 Page 2 of 6
2026
(12) “Collaborating practitioner” means a physician licensed to practice
medicine pursuant to chapter 23 or 33 of this title with a specialty in
psychiatry.
(13) “Drug” has the same meaning as in section 2022 of this title.
(14) “DSM” means the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental
Disorders current at the time of practice.
(15) “Prescribing psychologist” means a licensed, doctoral-level
psychologist who has undergone specialized training, has passed an
examination as determined by rule, and has received a current prescribing
specialty under section 3019 of this title that has not been revoked or
suspended by the Board.
(16) “Prescription drug” has the same meaning as in section 2022 of this
title.
(17) “Prescriptive authority” means the authority to prescribe or
discontinue prescription drugs solely for the purpose of diagnosing, treating, or
managing a condition recognized in the DSM. Prescriptive authority excludes
the authority to:
(A) dispense, administer, or distribute prescription drugs; and
(B) prescribe or discontinue prescription drugs for patients who are
less than 18 years of age, over 80 years of age, or pregnant.
VT LEG #389247 v.1

No. 84 Page 3 of 6
2026
Sec. 2. 26 V.S.A. § 3009a is amended to read:
§ 3009a. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD
(a) The Board shall adopt rules necessary to perform its duties under this
chapter, including rules that:
(1) specify educational and other prerequisites for obtaining licensure;
(2) explain complaint and appeal procedures to licensees, applicants,
and the public;
(3) explain continuing education requirements; and
(3) regulate prescribing psychologist licensees pursuant to section 3019
of this title, including:
(A) the settings of clinical rotations;
(B) the minimum requirements for the curriculum of a postdoctoral
psychopharmacology program; and
(C) prescriptive authority, including the designation of conditions
and drugs excluded from that authority, as well as requirements for the
prescribing of particular drugs; and
(4) explain how the Board shall investigate suspected unprofessional
conduct regulate collaborative practice agreements pursuant to section 3019 of
this title, including collaborating practitioner qualifications and annual
competency evaluations.
* * *
VT LEG #389247 v.1

No. 84 Page 4 of 6
2026
Sec. 3. 26 V.S.A. § 3019 is added to read:
§ 3019. PRESCRIBING BY DOCTORAL-LEVEL PSYCHOLOGISTS
SPECIALTY
(a) Prescribing psychologist specialty. A psychologist-doctorate may apply
to the Board for a prescribing psychologist specialty. The application shall be
made in a manner approved by the Board and include the payment of any
required fees.
(b) Specialty by examination. A psychologist-doctorate shall be eligible
for the prescribing specialty if the psychologist-doctorate:
(1) holds a current license to practice psychology at the doctoral level in
the State;
(2) has successfully completed a postdoctoral training program in
psychopharmacology designated by the American Psychological Association
or its successor;
(3) has completed clinical rotations over a total of not less than 14
months in not less than five practice settings, to include psychiatry, geriatrics,
family or internal medicine, emergency medicine, and neurology;
(4) has completed a national certifying exam, as determined by rule; and
(5) meets all other requirements for obtaining a prescribing psychologist
specialty, as determined by rule.
VT LEG #389247 v.1

No. 84 Page 5 of 6
2026
(c) Criteria for prescribing medication.
(1) A written collaborative agreement is required for all prescribing
psychologists practicing under a prescribing psychologist specialty issued
pursuant to this section.
(2) The issuance of prescriptive authority by a collaborating practitioner
to a prescribing psychologist shall only include prescription drugs for the
treatment of mental health conditions that the collaborating practitioner
generally provides to patients in the normal course of practice.
(3) The collaborating practitioner shall file the collaborative agreement
with the Board and notice of any termination of the agreement.
(4) Issuance of prescribing authority for Schedule II–V controlled
substances shall identify the specific controlled substance by brand name or
generic name. Prescription or administration of a controlled substance by
injection shall not be allowed.
(d) Specialty by endorsement. The Director of the Board may, upon
payment of any required fee, grant a prescribing specialty without examination
if:
(1) the applicant holds active psychologist prescribing authority in
another U.S. or Canadian jurisdiction; and
(2) the requirements for psychologist prescribing authority in that
jurisdiction are, in the judgment of the Director, substantially equivalent to the
requirements of this section.
VT LEG #389247 v.1

No. 84 Page 6 of 6
2026
Sec. 4. REPORT; PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGISTS
On or before November 15, 2032, the Office of Professional Regulation
shall submit a written report to the House Committee on Health Care and to the
Senate Committee on Health and Welfare regarding:
(1) the number of psychologists with a prescribing specialty pursuant to
26 V.S.A. § 3019;
(2) the status of available collaborative practitioners; and
(3) whether any updates to the qualifications of prescribing
psychologists are necessary to expand access to care while also ensuring public
protection.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 2 (power and duties of the Board) shall take effect
on July 1, 2026.
(b) All remaining sections shall take effect on July 1, 2029.
Date Governor signed bill: April 27, 2026
VT LEG #389247 v.1